Montana, session 2025, HB899.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. State shooting complex FACILITIES AND IMPROVEMENTS development and oversight
task force -- membership -- duties -- reporting. (1) There is a state shooting complex facilities and
improvements development and oversight task force, which is composed of the following members:
(a) the governor or the governor's designee;
(b) a member of the board of state parks and recreation or the board member's designee;
(c) the director of the department of commerce or the director's designee;
(d) two members representing firearm, archery, or firearm accessory manufacturing companies in
the state, appointed by the governor;
(e) one member of the public representing a shooting sports organization that has representation
in the state, appointed by the governor;
(f) one member of the public representing a hunting or wildlife conservation organization that is
headquartered in the state or that has an active chapter in the state, appointed by the governor;
(g) two members of the house of representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house. The
speaker of the house shall designate a co-chairperson of the task force.
(h) two members of the senate, appointed by the president of the senate. The president of the
senate shall designate a co-chairperson of the task force.
(2) The task force shall:
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 899
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 899
(a) develop a framework for the selection of a location for the Montana state shooting complex
facilities and improvements;
(b) review other all shooting facilities in the region and develop preliminary specifications, plans,
and features for the Montana state shooting complex facilities and improvements;
(c) develop a request for proposals so that local governments, private sector entities, or a
combination of both may submit proposals to be considered for the location of the Montana state shooting
complex facilities and improvements; and
(d) make recommendations for the development, location, and administrative structure of the
Montana state shooting complex facilities and improvements to the governor, the joint appropriations
subcommittee on natural resources and transportation, and the joint fish, wildlife, and parks committee.
(3) A vacancy in the task force must be filled in the same manner as members are appointed
under subsection (1).
(4) By June 30, 2027, the task force shall report to the governor and the economic affairs interim
committee.
(5) The task force is allocated to the department of fish, wildlife, and parks for administrative
purposes only as provided in 2-15-121.
(6) (a) Except as provided in subsection (6)(b) and unless otherwise provided by law, each
member is entitled to be paid $100 for each day in which the member is engaged in the performance of duties
under this section and is also entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses, as provided for in 2-18-501 through
2-18-503, incurred while performing task force duties.
(b) Members who are full-time, salaried officers or employees of this state or of a political
subdivision of this state are not entitled to be compensated for their service as members except when they
perform their task force duties outside of their regular working hours or during hours charged against their leave
time, but those members are entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided for in 2-18-501 through
2-18-503.
Section 2. Montana state shooting complex FACILITIES AND IMPROVEMENTS account. (1) There is a
Montana state shooting complex facilities and improvements account in the state special revenue fund
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 899
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 899
established in 17-2-102. The account is administered by the department of commerce fish, wildlife, and parks.
(2) Money transferred from a lawful source, including but not limited to gifts, grants, donations,
securities, and other assets, public or private, may be deposited in the account.
(3) Money in the account may be used only for the siting and construction of the Montana state
shooting complex to develop a framework for the selection and location of state-supported shooting facilities,
improvements in existing facilities, and funding mechanisms.
(4) Interest and income earned on the account and any unspent or unencumbered money in the
account at the end of a fiscal year must remain in the account.
Section 3. Appropriation. (1) There is appropriated $55,000 from the general fund to the department
of fish, wildlife, and parks for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, for the purposes described in [section 1].
(2) Money from the appropriation that is not spent during the biennium must revert to the general
fund.
Section 4. Effective date. [This act] is effective July 1, 2025.
Section 5. Termination. [Section 1] terminates June 30, 2027.
- END -
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – HB 899
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 899, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 899
INTRODUCED BY K. SEEKINS-CROWE, B. LER, J. ETCHART, L. DEMING, E. ALBUS, L. BREWSTER, E.
BUTTREY, P. FIELDER, C. HINKLE, S. MANESS, B. MITCHELL, F. NAVE, C. SCHOMER, E. TILLEMAN
AN ACT CREATING THE MONTANA STATE SHOOTING COMPLEX FACILITIES AND IMPROVEMENTS
DEVELOPMENT AND OVERSIGHT TASK FORCE; CREATING THE MONTANA STATE SHOOTING
COMPLEX FACILITIES AND IMPROVEMENTS ACCOUNT; PROVIDING AN APPROPRIATION;
ESTABLISHING REPORTING REQUIREMENTS; AND PROVIDING AN EFFECTIVE DATE AND A
TERMINATION DATE.